Maryland, session 2025, SB0951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–510.
(c) (6) (I) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS
TITLE, AN INVESTOR–OWNED ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY:
1. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN GENERATING FACILITIES; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0951*

SENATE BILL 951
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN TRANSMISSION FACILITIES NECESSARY TO INTERCONNECT THE GENERATING
FACILITIES WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM.
(II) [In] IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IT IS
NECESSARY IN order to meet long–term, anticipated demand in the State for standard
offer service and other electricity supply, the Commission may require [or allow], SUBJECT
TO APPROPRIATE COST RECOVERY, an investor–owned electric company to:
1. construct, acquire, or lease, and operate, its own
generating facilities[,]; and
2. CONSTRUCT, ACQUIRE, OR LEASE, AND OPERATE, ITS
OWN transmission facilities necessary to interconnect the generating facilities with the
electric [grid, subject to appropriate cost recovery] SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.